Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.180

Prohibited acts relating to registration, examination, certification—Discrimination prohibited.

No commissioner or any other person , shall, by himself or herself or in cooperation with others, defeat, deceive, or obstruct any person in respect of his or her right of examination or registration according to the rules and regulations, or falsely mark, grade, estimate, or report upon the examination or proper standing of any person examined, registered, or certified pursuant to this chapter, or aid in so doing, or make any false representation concerning the same, or concerning the person examined, or furnish any person any special or secret information for the purpose of improving or injuring the prospects or chances of any person so examined, registered or certified, or to be examined, registered, or certified, or persuade any other person, or permit or aid in any manner any other person to personate him or her, in connection with any examination or registration of application or request to be examined or registered.

The right of any person to an appointment or promotion to any position in a sheriff's office shall not be withheld because of his or her race, color, creed, national origin, political affiliation or belief, nor shall any person be dismissed, demoted, or reduced in grade for such reason.

[ 2012 c 117 s 16; 1959 c 1 s 18 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]